hr-HR: Orijentacija spremnika goriva: Bilo koje (univerzalno); Vodoravno; Okomito; Ostalo
es: Orientación del depósito de combustible: Cualquiera (universal); Horizontal; Vertical; Otro
sl-SI: Orientacija rezervoarja za gorivo: Katerakoli (univerzalna); Vodoravna; Navpična; Drugo
fi: Polttoainesäiliön suunta: Kumpi tahansa (yleismalli); Vaakasuuntainen; Pystysuuntainen; Muu
cs: Orientace palivové nádrže: Kterákoliv (univerzální); Horizontální; Vertikální; Ostatní
da: Brændstoftankens orientering: Hvilken som helst (universel); Vandret; Lodret; Andet
nb: Orientering av drivstofftanken: Begge (universell); Horisontal; Vertikal; Annet
vi: Hướng lắp đặt bình nhiên liệu: Có thể đảo chiều (vạn năng); Ngang; Dọc; Khác
ko: 연료 탱크 방향: 양방향(범용); 수평; 수직; 기타
de: Ausrichtung des Kraftstofftanks: Beides (universell); Horizontal; Vertikal; Sonstige
zh-TW: 燃油箱安裝方向: 皆可 (通用); 水平; 垂直; 其他
nl: Brandstoftank oriëntatie: Beide (universeel); Horizontaal; Verticaal; Anders
fr: Orientation du réservoir de carburant: L'un ou l'autre (universel); Horizontal; Vertical; Autre
tr: Yakıt deposu yönü: Her ikisi (evrensel); Yatay; Dikey; Diğer
it: Orientamento del serbatoio del carburante: Entrambi (universale); Orizzontale; Verticale; Altro
ja: 燃料タンクの向き: どちらでも (ユニバーサル); 水平; 垂直; その他
en: Fuel tank orientation: Either (universal); Horizontal; Vertical; Other
ro-RO: Orientarea rezervorului de combustibil: Oricare (universal); Orizontal; Vertical; Altele
th: การวางแนวถังน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: แบบใดก็ได้ (อเนกประสงค์); แนวนอน; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Ориентация на резервоара за гориво: Всякаква (универсална); Хоризонтална; Вертикална; Друго
pl: Orientacja zbiornika paliwa: Dowolna (uniwersalna); Pozioma; Pionowa; Inna
ru: Ориентация топливного бака: Любая (универсальный); Горизонтальная; Вертикальная; Другое
pt-PT: Orientação do depósito de combustível: Qualquer (universal); Horizontal; Vertical; Outro
el: Προσανατολισμός δεξαμενής καυσίμου: Οποιοδήποτε (γενικής χρήσης); Οριζόντιος; Κάθετος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Orientação do tanque de combustível: Qualquer um (universal); Horizontal; Vertical; Outro
lt-LT: Kuro bako orientacija: Bet kokia (universali); Horizontali; Vertikali; Kita
hu: Üzemanyagtartály tájolása: Bármelyik (univerzális); Vízszintes; Függőleges; Egyéb
sv: Bränsletankens orientering: Valfri (universell); Horisontell; Vertikal; Övrigt
zh-CN: 油箱朝向: 任意（通用）; 水平; 垂直; 其他
sk-SK: Orientácia palivovej nádrže: Ktorákoľvek (univerzálna); Horizontálna; Vertikálna; Iná